Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-118
Buildings; plans; approval.

No superstructural work upon any building for the university shall be commenced until the designs and plans therefor shall have been approved in the manner prescribed by the Board of Regents.

Laws 1869, § 24, p. 179;

R.S.1913, § 7112;

C.S.1922, § 6744;

C.S.1929, § 85-130;

R.S.1943, § 85-118;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 5.